Illinois, session 104th, SB3732.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Warehouse Pollution Reduction Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 8Agency.9    "Board" means the Illinois Pollution Control Board.10    "Fulfillment center" means a facility whose primary 11purpose is storage and distribution of goods to businesses or 12end users, either directly or through a parcel hub.13    "Overburdened community" has the same meaning as 14"environmental justice community" as defined by, and as may be 15updated in, the long-term renewable resources procurement plan 16of the Illinois Power Agency and its program administrator 17under the Illinois Solar for All Program.18    "Owner or operator" means any person who owns, leases, 19operates, controls, or supervises a qualifying warehouse.20    "Parcel hub" means a last-mile facility or similar 21facility whose primary purpose is processing or redistribution 22of goods for delivery directly to consumers or end users, by 23moving a shipment from one mode of transport to a vehicle with   SB3732- 2 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1a rated capacity of less than 10,000 pounds.2    "Parcel sorting facility" means a facility whose primary 3purpose is sorting or redistribution of goods from a 4fulfillment center to a parcel hub.5    "Qualifying warehouse" means a fulfillment center, parcel 6hub, or parcel sorting facility that is 30,000 square feet or 7greater, whether as originally constructed or as modified; or 8a facility owned or operated by any person, including all 9affiliates of that person, who in the aggregate owns or 10operates 500,000 square feet or more of qualifying warehouse 11space in the State.12    "Sensitive receptor" means a pre-existing:13        (1) dwelling, including a private home or residence, 14    apartment, condominium unit, group home, dormitory, 15    nursing home, retirement home, care facility, or any 16    building or structure where at least one natural person or 17    family unit resides;18        (2) school, including a preschool, prekindergarten, or 19    school maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, 20    inclusive;21        (3) day care facility, including, but not limited to, 22    in-home day care;23        (4) public park, playground, recreational area, or 24    facility primarily occupied or used by children;25        (5) hospital, urgent care, reproductive health center, 26    or any facility that provides health, medical, or senior   SB3732- 3 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    services; or2        (6) overburdened community.3    "Truck trip" means the one-way trip a class 2b-8 truck or 4tractor makes to or from a facility, where a single truck's or 5tractor's entrance to and subsequent exit from the same 6facility counts as 2 trips (one inbound trip and one outbound 7trip).8    "Warehouse modification" means a modification to a 9warehouse that adds additional warehouse floor space that may 10be used for warehousing activities, or a change in operations 11of a warehouse that is likely to result in a significant 12increase in air pollution.13    "ZEV" means any on-road or off-road vehicle powered with a 14zero-emission powertrain that produces zero exhaust emissions 15of any criteria pollutant, precursor pollutant, or greenhouse 16gas in any mode of operation or condition, as determined by the 17Agency. 18    Section 10. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:19    (1) The State has a longstanding policy to restore, 20protect, and enhance the environment, including the purity of 21the air of this State. 22    (2) The transportation sector accounts for a significant 23proportion of the State's air pollution, including emissions 24of particulate matter and nitrogen oxides that in turn 25generate ozone pollution, and this pollution is associated   SB3732- 4 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1with serious health impacts for the State's residents. 2    (3) Air pollution is associated with increased health care 3costs and lost workdays, both of which increase financial 4burdens on Illinois households. 5    (4) Warehouses, logistics centers, and other freight 6facilities draw high volumes of trucks, heavy equipment, and 7other sources of diesel pollution, creating air pollution hot 8spots. 9    (5) Air quality in the State's major freight hubs is poor, 10and the State's existing policies have been inadequate to 11address this issue and ensure attainment of federal air 12quality standards. 13    (6) Air pollution levels may vary greatly from one end of a 14block to another, and data from standard monitoring practices 15does not capture these variances or air pollution hot spots. 16    (7) The number of warehouses and other freight facilities 17in the State is growing rapidly. 18    (8) Many communities living near or working at warehouses 19or other freight facilities are lower-income people and people 20of color, and these populations bear a disproportionate burden 21of harms from this activity. 22    (9) Those most at risk from the impacts of air pollution 23from the transportation sector include children, older adults, 24and warehouse workers. 25    (10) Air-quality data alone does not adequately reflect 26the impact of air pollution on the State's residents, and   SB3732- 5 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1cumulative impact analyses that account for factors including 2age, race, socioeconomic status, and access to health care are 3needed. 4    (11) The State's residents, particularly communities 5living in air-pollution hot spots associated with freight 6activity, have a right to know about freight activities and 7related emissions in their communities to understand the 8health implications and meaningfully participate in 9decision-making related to these facilities. 10    (12) Meaningful participation of State residents is 11critical to ensuring that environmental laws and rules are 12implemented and enforced in a manner that protects and 13improves the well-being of communities most impacted by 14development or operation of warehouses and other freight 15facilities. 16    (13) The federal Clean Air Act expressly reserves state 17authority to regulate aggregate air pollution at indirect 18sources, or sites that attract or may attract mobile sources 19of pollution. 20    (14) It is in the public interest to fund, develop, 21implement, and enforce an indirect source review program for 22mitigating air pollution from freight activity. 23    Section 15. Purposes. This Act has the purposes to:24    (1) increase transparency about warehouse information and 25ensure people have the right to meaningfully participate in   SB3732- 6 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1decision-making related to these facilities;2    (2) protect vulnerable communities from harmful warehouse 3impacts; 4    (3) restore, maintain, and enhance the air quality of this 5State in order to protect residents' health and welfare; 6    (4) regulate air quality and reduce air pollution from 7warehouses to achieve and maintain attainment with federal air 8quality standards; 9    (5) establish and fund an indirect source review program 10that will be developed and enforced with community input; and11    (6) advance the State's commitment to reach net-zero 12greenhouse gas emissions by 2050. 13    Section 20. Prohibited acts. No person shall: 14    (1) fail to disclose, in a timely manner, any information 15required under Section 30 or rules adopted under this Act; 16    (2) make a false or misleading representation in 17connection with reporting under Section 30 or rules adopted 18under this Act; 19    (3) construct a new or modified qualifying warehouse 20without a construction permit; or 21    (4) fail or refuse to pay any fee or civil penalty imposed 22under this Act or rules adopted under this Act. 23    Section 25. Qualifying Warehouse Review Program.24    (a) Within 12 months after the effective date of this Act,   SB3732- 7 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1the Agency shall propose to the Board rules establishing a 2program for facility-by-facility review of qualifying 3warehouses. The program shall not be inconsistent with 42 4U.S.C. 7410(a)(5) and shall include measures necessary to 5ensure, or assist in ensuring, that emissions from each 6qualifying warehouse in the State will not: 7        (1) cause or contribute to air-pollution 8    concentrations exceeding any federal air-quality standard; 9    or 10        (2) prevent maintenance of any such standard.11    (b) No later than 6 months after receiving the Agency's 12program proposal, the Board shall adopt final rules after 13accepting public comment on the proposal and making any 14responsive revisions.15    (c) The program proposed by the Agency and adopted by the 16Board under this Act shall: 17        (1) set reporting, recordkeeping, and notice 18    requirements, including deadlines, for information 19    regarding each qualifying warehouse, as provided under 20    Section 30, where the initial reporting deadline for any 21    qualifying warehouse in operation on the effective date of 22    this Act is no later than 6 months after that date; 23        (2) establish a fee schedule for reports and permit 24    applications submitted to the Agency under this Act and 25    rules adopted under this Act, where: 26            (A) the fee amounts shall, in the aggregate, be   SB3732- 8 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1        adequate to ensure sufficient funding for development, 2        implementation, maintenance, and enforcement of 3        programs under this Act and rules adopted under this 4        Act; and 5            (B) the schedule shall be updated at least once 6        every 2 years to ensure sufficient funding for 7        development, implementation, maintenance, and 8        enforcement of programs under this Act and rules 9        adopted under this Act; 10        (3) set annual emissions-reduction targets consistent 11    with the State's goals of achieving net-zero greenhouse 12    gas emissions by 2050 and achieving or maintaining 13    compliance with federal air-quality standards, and require 14    qualifying warehouses to meet the targets; 15        (4) establish a system assigning points corresponding 16    to emissions-reduction targets and setting point 17    designations for air-pollution mitigation measures, as 18    provided under Section 45, with point designations updated 19    at least annually; 20        (5) establish a system for collecting and distributing 21    all mitigation fees collected from qualifying warehouses 22    under Sections 45 and 50; 23        (6) establish a qualifying warehouse registry, as 24    provided under Section 40, to make information regarding 25    qualifying warehouses readily accessible to the public; 26        (7) establish a construction-permit program for   SB3732- 9 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    relevant qualifying warehouses or facilities that may be 2    qualifying warehouses, as provided under Section 35, 3    requiring the owner or operator of each relevant 4    qualifying warehouse to obtain and comply with the terms 5    of any permit issued under this program; and 6        (8) require the Agency to report, at least annually 7    and in a manner readily accessible to the public, the 8    estimated air quality and greenhouse-gas emissions at each 9    qualifying warehouse. 10    Section 30. Reporting; recordkeeping; notices.11    (a) With an initial reporting deadline for any qualifying 12warehouse no later than 6 months after the effective date of 13this Act, the operator of each qualifying warehouse shall 14submit to the Agency, at least annually, a report certified in 15accordance with Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure 16that discloses:17        (1) location information, including GPS coordinates, 18    the street address, and property lines; and19        (2) owner or operator information, including the name 20    of the property owner, the name of any parent company, the 21    name of any entity leasing the facility, 6-digit NAICS 22    code, and contact information for any entity operating, 23    controlling, or supervising the facility, including: 24            (A) contact information for the individual 25        responsible for the facility's compliance with this   SB3732- 10 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1        Act and rules adopted under this Act; 2            (B) lease information, if applicable, including 3        the parties and duration of any lease of facility 4        space; 5            (C) facility's secured lender, if applicable; 6            (D) space information, including square footage, 7        number of loading docks, and number of truck bays; 8            (E) any documented labor, health, and 9        environmental violations of any municipal, State, or 10        federal laws or rules; 11            (F) methods to be used for accurately and 12        precisely collecting data necessary for complying with 13        the requirements of this Section; 14            (G) number of electric-vehicle charging stations 15        installed and actual usage; 16            (H) number of hydrogen fueling stations installed 17        and actual usage; 18            (I) number of on-site renewable and non-renewable 19        energy-generation systems installed at the facility 20        and their generation; 21            (J) number of vehicles used to deliver goods or 22        materials from the facility that are leased to a third 23        party by the owner or operator; the proportion of 24        vehicles that are leased; and the proportion that are 25        owned by the operator; 26            (K) average daily number and annual average of   SB3732- 11 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1        inbound and outbound truck trips by vehicle weight, 2        class, vehicle age, and fuel type; by time of day; and 3        by day of the week; 4            (L) average duration of engine idling by vehicle 5        weight, class, age, and fuel type, including a 6        breakdown of vehicles equipped with a transportation 7        refrigeration unit; 8            (M) average daily number of inbound and outbound 9        truck trips associated with trucks with transportation 10        refrigeration units, and the age and fuel type of 11        transportation refrigeration units; 12            (N) GPS data for Class 2b through Class 8 trucks 13        that make trips to and from a qualifying warehouse 14        owned, leased, dispatched, or operationally controlled 15        by a warehouse owner or operator, when such data is 16        collected in the ordinary course of business; 17            (O) gross revenue attributable to Illinois 18        facilities or operations; 19            (P) sum of State and federal tax incentives or 20        subsidies received in the previous 5 tax years, if 21        applicable; 22            (Q) number of jobs at the facility, including 23        drivers and others employed by third-party 24        contractors, with a breakdown of part-time and 25        full-time employees, independent contractors, and 26        union and non-union employees;   SB3732- 12 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1            (R) percentage of vehicles used, specifying 2        on-road vehicles and off-road vehicles as well as 3        weight and vehicle class, that are zero-emission; 4            (S) contracts for services with any government 5        body where the value of that contract equals or 6        exceeds $1,000,000; 7            (T) air-pollution mitigation measures adopted and 8        to be adopted to meet the facility's 9        emissions-reduction requirements under this Act and 10        rules adopted under this Act; 11            (U) points the facility has been credited for 12        mitigation measures undertaken to meet its 13        emissions-reduction requirements under this Act and 14        rules adopted under this Act, including the number of 15        points banked or carried over from another year; 16            (V) for any air-pollution mitigation measure 17        adopted or to be adopted that may reduce the number of 18        truck trips or change the terms of a collective 19        bargaining agreement with the qualifying warehouse's 20        employees, confirmation that the owner or operator 21        has: 22                (i) consulted the representative of the 23            exclusive bargaining unit or workers potentially 24            impacted or displaced by implementation of the 25            measure, including discussion of anticipated 26            workforce-transition or retraining impacts; and   SB3732- 13 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1                (ii) reached an agreement, in writing, with 2            the bargaining-unit representative or a majority 3            of the workers to proceed with the measure, 4            including any commitments related to worker 5            retention or retraining, if applicable; and 6            (W) any other information the Agency deems 7        necessary to effectively implement and enforce this 8        Act and rules adopted under this Act. 9    Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring 10any public disclosure prohibited by law. 11    Where multiple qualifying warehouses share access roads, 12loading docks, driveways, or parking facilities, reporting 13under this Section shall reflect cumulative activity at the 14shared facility unless the Agency determines that activity can 15be reasonably apportioned. When multiple operators occupy a 16single qualifying warehouse, the owner shall report 17shared-infrastructure activity and each operator shall report 18activity attributable to its operations, as specified by the 19Agency. 20    (b) The owner or operator of each qualifying warehouse 21shall maintain, for a minimum of 7 years, records sufficient 22to demonstrate the accuracy and validity of all information 23submitted to the Agency under this Section. 24    (c) The Agency shall assess and collect from the operator 25of each qualifying warehouse a fee for each report submitted 26under this Section:   SB3732- 14 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1        (1) the fee amounts shall, in the aggregate, be 2    adequate to ensure sufficient funding for development, 3    implementation, maintenance, and enforcement of programs 4    under this Act; 5        (2) the schedule shall be updated at least once every 6    2 years to ensure sufficient funding for development, 7    implementation, maintenance, and enforcement of programs 8    under this Act; and 9        (3) the Agency shall deposit all such fees into the 10    Warehouse Pollution Management Fund. 11    Section 35. Permitting; home rule; fee.12    (a) The Agency has authority to adopt procedural rules, in 13accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, as 14the Agency deems necessary to implement this Section, 15including requirements that: 16        (1) not more than 15 days after the owner or operator 17    of a facility that is, will be, or could become a 18    qualifying warehouse applies for a construction permit to 19    construct a new or modified qualifying warehouse or a 20    facility that could become a qualifying warehouse, the 21    owner or operator of the facility shall send, via 22    first-class mail, written notice of the application to all 23    residents and property owners within 900 feet of the 24    subject facility and all municipal and county elected 25    officials representing the area where the subject facility   SB3732- 15 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    is located; 2        (2) not more than 30 days after receipt of a complete 3    construction-permit application to build a new or modified 4    qualifying warehouse, the Agency shall publicly disclose, 5    including by posting on a publicly available website: (A) 6    that the Agency has received a construction-permit 7    application under this Act; and (B) all 8    construction-permit application materials in full and 9    unredacted form, as permitted by law; 10        (3) not more than 90 days after receipt of a complete 11    construction-permit application under this Act, the Agency 12    shall: 13            (A) give public notice, including by posting on a 14        publicly available website, of its preliminary 15        determination to either issue or deny the permit; and 16            (B) give notice of the opportunity for a public 17        hearing on that preliminary determination and, upon 18        request of the permit applicant or of any other person 19        admitted as a party under rules adopted by the Agency, 20        schedule a public hearing; 21        (4) within 60 days after the date of the Agency notice 22    required under paragraph (3), any person who may be 23    adversely affected by the Agency's decision on the 24    construction-permit application may petition the Agency to 25    intervene as a party; the petition to intervene shall 26    contain a short and plain statement identifying the   SB3732- 16 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    petitioner and stating the petitioner's interest; the 2    petitioner shall serve the petition upon the applicant for 3    the permit and upon any other persons who have petitioned 4    to intervene; unless the Agency determines that the 5    petition is duplicative or frivolous, it shall admit the 6    petitioner as a party; 7        (5) not less than 60 days and not more than 180 days 8    after the date of the Agency notice required under 9    paragraph (3), the Agency shall commence the public 10    hearing required by this Section; the public hearing and 11    other proceedings under this Section shall be conducted in 12    accordance with the provisions concerning contested cases 13    of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act; the Agency 14    shall disclose, including by posting on a publicly 15    available website, all documents submitted to the Agency 16    in connection with the public hearing; and 17        (6) within 60 days after the close of the 18    public-comment period or public hearing under this 19    Section, whichever is later, the Agency shall render a 20    final decision granting or denying the permit. 21    (b) Prior to construction of a new or modified qualifying 22warehouse or a facility that could become a qualifying 23warehouse, the owner or operator shall apply to the Agency for 24a construction permit, and the Agency may issue a permit 25authorizing construction only if it finds: 26        (1) the procedural requirements in subsection (a) have   SB3732- 17 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    been met; 2        (2) any additional traffic resulting from construction 3    and operation will not result in a violation of one or more 4    national ambient air-quality standards established by the 5    federal Environmental Protection Agency or, if a violation 6    already exists, will not exacerbate such violation, as 7    determined in a manner consistent with the State 8    implementation plan; 9        (3) the facility will be ready for zero-emission 10    operations and infrastructure upon completion of the 11    proposed development, including: 12            (A) on-site solar power generation; 13            (B) battery storage; and 14            (C) managed electric-vehicle charging systems and 15        infrastructure necessary to reduce electricity demand 16        and associated emissions; and 17        (4) the facility will meet LEED Silver, Gold, or 18    Platinum standards, or a functionally equivalent standard 19    that demonstrably reduces energy consumption, 20    greenhouse-gas emissions, or associated air pollutants 21    upon completion of the proposed development. 22    (c) Any permit for construction of a new or modified 23qualifying warehouse or a facility that could become a 24qualifying warehouse, where the subject of the permit has a 25property line within 900 feet of a sensitive receptor, shall 26require:   SB3732- 18 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1        (1) any new truck loading bay to be located outside a 2    minimum 1,000-foot radius from the boundary of each 3    sensitive receptor; 4        (2) the locations at which trucks enter and exit the 5    property line of a qualifying warehouse to be at least 500 6    feet from each sensitive receptor; 7        (3) internal circulation of vehicles that are not 8    ZEVs, including through placement of roads and loading 9    docks, to limit or mitigate air-pollution exposure of the 10    sensitive receptor; 11        (4) no diesel-truck aisles to be located adjacent to 12    the boundary of any sensitive receptor; and 13        (5) construction of a buffer at least 100 feet wide, 14    measured from the boundary of any adjacent sensitive 15    receptor; the buffer shall include a solid decorative 16    wall, landscaped berm and wall, or a landscaped berm 10 17    feet or more in height and solid-screen buffering trees 18    planted in 2 rows along the length of the boundary 19    adjacent to the sensitive receptor; trees used for this 20    purpose shall be evergreen and, to the extent feasible, 21    composed of native species with low biogenic emissions, of 22    a minimum 36-inch box size at planting, and spaced at no 23    greater distance than 40 feet on center.24    (d) A unit of local government, including a home rule 25unit, may not enforce any ordinance that authorizes 26construction or modification of a qualifying warehouse that is   SB3732- 19 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1less stringent than the requirements of this Section. This 2Section is a denial and limitation on the concurrent exercise 3by home rule units of powers and functions under subsection 4(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.5    (e) The Agency shall assess and collect from the owner or 6operator of each qualifying warehouse a fee determined by the 7Agency for each permit application submitted under this 8Section. The Agency shall deposit all such fees into the 9Warehouse Pollution Management Fund. 10    Section 40. Qualifying warehouse registry.11    (a) Within 12 months after the effective date of this Act, 12the Agency, in collaboration with the Department of Labor, the 13Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, and other 14relevant agencies, shall establish a qualifying warehouse 15registry that makes the following information readily 16accessible to the public, including by posting on a publicly 17available website:18        (1) information collected under Section 30; 19        (2) air-quality modeling information associated with 20    each qualifying warehouse; 21        (3) full and unredacted reports and notices generated 22    or collected under Section 30; and 23        (4) full and unredacted permitting records generated 24    or collected under Section 35, including all notices, 25    permit applications, and preliminary and final decisions   SB3732- 20 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    of the Agency. 2    (b) The Agency shall ensure that any report received by 3the Agency after the initial establishment of the registry is 4added to the registry and made readily accessible to the 5public within 5 days after receipt by the Agency. 6    (c) The registry shall be searchable for all records 7associated with a specific qualifying warehouse using any one 8of the following search terms: street address, zip code, name 9of the locality in which the qualifying warehouse is located, 10or name of the owner or operator. 11    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as 12requiring any public disclosure prohibited by law. 13    Section 45. Point designations and administration.14    (a) The Agency shall assign annual points requirements 15corresponding to emissions-reduction targets; set point 16designations for air-pollution mitigation measures; award and 17administer points; and take any other actions necessary to 18track points earned by each qualifying warehouse and to ensure 19compliance with annual points requirements. 20    (b) A qualifying warehouse that manages truck trips to or 21from an overburdened community shall have an annual points 22requirement that is 25% higher than that of a comparable 23facility that does not meet these conditions. 24    (c) A qualifying warehouse may receive points for 25mitigation measures including:   SB3732- 21 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1        (1) acquisition of ZEVs; 2        (2) using zero-emission trucks at the regulated 3    facility or for truck trips to and from the regulated 4    facility; 5        (3) installing, or contracting with a third party to 6    install, light-duty, medium-duty, and heavy-duty 7    electric-charging infrastructure on-site or within 8    one-half mile; 9        (4) using electric-charging infrastructure; 10        (5) requiring use of zero-emission vehicles on-site; 11        (6) reducing stationary-source pollution beyond what 12    is required for facilities defined as stationary sources 13    under 35 Ill. Adm. Code 203.136 or successor rules; 14        (7) using electric transportation-refrigeration 15    units; 16        (8) acquiring electric transportation-refrigeration 17    units; 18        (9) using alternatives to truck trips for incoming or 19    outgoing trips, such as e-cargo bikes or light-duty 20    battery-electric vehicles; 21        (10) installing on-site solar power generation, 22    electricity storage, and managed-charging systems; 23        (11) installing and maintaining MERV-16 or greater 24    filtration systems in schools, day cares, hospitals, 25    community centers, or residences within one-half mile of a 26    regulated facility;   SB3732- 22 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1        (12) eliminating combustion emissions from cooking, 2    heating, hot water, or generators at the regulated 3    facility, or at buildings within one-half mile of a 4    regulated facility, by replacing appliances and equipment; 5        (13) reducing transport emissions for regulated 6    facilities and surrounding areas by contributing to and 7    maintaining bicycle-share or electric-vehicle-share 8    programs or public transportation; 9        (14) hiring locally to reduce employee-commute 10    emissions, using a local State-certified apprenticeship 11    program or a skilled and trained workforce with a 12    local-hire component, or implementing 13    workforce-transition or retraining strategies intended to 14    retain existing workers while reducing pollution; or 15        (15) paying a mitigation fee, the price of which shall 16    be set 1.5 times higher per point than the next most 17    expensive option. 18    (d) No points shall be designated or awarded under the 19program for: 20        (1) any actions required for compliance with any 21    federal, State, or municipal law other than this Act and 22    rules adopted under this Act; or 23        (2) mitigation measures undertaken but not reported to 24    the Agency as required under this Section. 25    (e) If a qualifying warehouse earns more points than its 26annual points requirement in a given reporting period, the   SB3732- 23 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1excess points may be banked and used by the same qualifying 2warehouse to satisfy its annual points requirement in any of 3the following 3 years, provided that the qualifying warehouse 4demonstrates that any improvements or equipment installations 5for which the banked points were awarded are still operational 6in the year in which they are used to meet the annual points 7requirement. 8    (f) The Agency shall update point designations at least 9annually. 10    Section 50. Mitigation fees. Whenever a qualifying 11warehouse pays a mitigation fee to receive points toward 12emissions-reduction requirements under Section 45, the fee 13shall be spent on measures that will mitigate air pollution in 14the same geographic area as the site of the qualifying 15warehouse. 16    Section 55. Air quality modeling.17    (a) Within 6 months after the effective date of this Act, 18the Agency shall publish and solicit public comment on a draft 19methodology for an air-quality and greenhouse-gas emissions 20modeling program that accurately models and reports speciated 21PM2.5, ozone, and NOx emissions volume and resulting 22concentrations generated by each qualifying warehouse. 23    (b) Within 9 months after the effective date of this Act, 24the Agency shall finalize its air-quality modeling-program   SB3732- 24 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1methodology. 2    (c) Within 12 months after the effective date of this Act, 3the Agency shall publish, under the qualifying-warehouse 4registry established under Section 40, results from its 5air-quality modeling program, and shall publish results 6annually thereafter. 7    (d) The air-quality modeling program under this Section 8may include qualifying-warehouse report information, vehicle 9telematics, driveway sensors, video monitoring, air-pollution 10monitoring data, and other advanced sensing and monitoring 11equipment. 12    Section 60. Warehouse Pollution Management Fund. There is 13created in the State treasury a special fund to be known as the 14Warehouse Pollution Management Fund. Fees collected by the 15Agency under this Act, except for mitigation fees paid for the 16purpose of earning points for compliance with 17emissions-reduction requirements, shall be deposited into the 18Warehouse Pollution Management Fund. In addition to any moneys 19appropriated from the General Revenue Fund, moneys in the 20Warehouse Pollution Management Fund may be appropriated to: 21        (1) the Agency exclusively for activities necessary to 22    execute its obligations and duties under this Act; and 23        (2) the Board for regulatory and adjudicatory 24    proceedings under this Act.   SB3732- 25 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    Section 65. Enforcement; penalties; rulemaking. 2    (a) The Agency shall administer and enforce this Act. The 3Agency is authorized to investigate violations of this Act or 4rules adopted under this Act. 5    (b) Any person who violates this Act or any rules adopted 6under this Act is liable for a civil penalty of $10,000. The 7Attorney General is authorized to bring a civil action to 8recover penalties under this Act. Nothing in this Act limits 9any damages, equitable relief, or other remedies available 10under common law or statute. 11    (c) The Agency shall propose and the Board shall adopt 12rules to implement and administer this Act. These rules may 13include procedures for administrative citations and 14adjudications that are substantially similar to those under 15the Environmental Protection Act. These rules may also include 16penalties for violations of this Act or rules adopted under 17this Act, except that any monetary penalties established by 18rule may not exceed the penalties under subsection (b) for a 19violation. 20    Section 70. Citizen suits; attorney's fees.21    (a) Any person adversely affected by a violation of this 22Act, any rule adopted under this Act, any permit decision or 23term or condition of a permit under this Act, or any Board 24order under this Act may commence a civil action for 25injunctive and other relief.   SB3732- 26 -LRB104 18135 BDA 31574 b1    (b) A court in an action under this Act may exercise all 2powers necessary to grant relief, including injunctive relief 3and money damages. 4    (c) Without limiting any authority that may otherwise 5exist for awarding attorney's fees and costs, the Board or a 6court of competent jurisdiction may award costs and reasonable 7attorney's fees, including the reasonable costs of expert 8witnesses and consultants, to the prevailing party in an 9action under this Act. 10    Section 800. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 11Section 5.1038 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)13    Sec. 5.1038. The Warehouse Pollution Management Fund. 14    Section 997. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 15severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.